apertium-bre.bre.dix
    <pardef n="/o__vpart">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="vpart"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oc’h</l><r>o<s n="vpart"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>’</l><r>o<s n="vpart"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>o</l><r>o<s n="vpart"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ra__vpart">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vpart"/><s n="opt"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="en_ur__vpart">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vpart"/><s n="ppres"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="en_em__vpart">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vpart"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ne__vpart">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vpart"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/e__vpart">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vpart"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ec’h</l><r>e<s n="vpart"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ez</l><r>e<s n="vpart"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>’</l><r>e<s n="vpart"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>e</l><r>e<s n="vpart"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- KEVRENN: Verboù -->
    

    <e lm="e"><i/><par n="/e__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i/><par n="/o__vpart"/></e>
      <e lm="é"><p><l>é</l><r>o</r></p><par n="/o__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="ra"><i>ra</i><par n="ra__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ne__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="ne__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="en em"><i>en<b/>em</i><par n="en_em__vpart"/></e>
    <e lm="en ur"><i>en<b/>ur</i><par n="en_ur__vpart"/></e>
